Massachusetts, session 194th, H708.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1 
MGL chapter 71 is hereby amended by adding a new section thereto as follows: 
Section 57B 
Section 57B. The committee, or the board of health in those municipalities where school 
health services are the responsibility of the board of health, shall cause every child in the public 
schools, and at the individual request of a parent or guardian of a pupil in a private school which 
has been approved under section one of chapter seventy-six, and which does not discriminate in 
its entrance requirements on the basis of race or color cause such pupil to be separately and 
carefully examined in such manner and at such intervals, including original entry, as may be 

of 3 10 determined by the department of public health after consultation with the department of 
education and the medical profession, to conduct a mental health wellness examination, as 
defined in section 32 of chapter 32A, and shall require a physical record of each child to be kept 
in such forms as prescribed by the provisions of section one hundred and eighty-five A of 
chapter one hundred and eleven.  
Upon entering kindergarten or within 30 days of the start of the school year, the parent or 
guardian of each child shall present to school health personnel certification that the child within 
the previous 12 months has received a mental heath wellness examination by a licensed 
professional. Any child shall be exempt on religious grounds from these examinations upon 
written request of parent or guardian on condition that the laws and regulations relating to 
communicable diseases shall not be violated.  
Every private school that does not perform these examinations shall be required to inform 
each parent and guardian of every enrolled pupil that the school does not conduct these 
examinations and shall recommend that the parent consult with the child's health care provider or 
local school committee or board of health to ensure that these examinations are conducted.  
Any person who conducts an examination of a child in response to such child having 
concerns about said  examination given in accordance with the provisions of this section shall 
forward a written report of the results of the examination to the school health personnel and a 
copy of said report to a parent or guardian of such child. Said report shall include, but not be 
limited to, the following:  
(a) date of the report;  
(b) name and address of the child;  

of 3 32  (c) name of the child's school;  
(d) type of examination;  
(e) a summary of significant findings, including diagnoses, medication used, duration of 
action of medication, treatment, prognosis, whether or not a return visit is recommended and, if 
so, when;  
(f) recommended educational adjustments for the child, if any;  
(g) name, address and signature of the examiner. 
SECTION 2 
Section 2GGGGG of chapter 29 is hereby amended by adding at the end of the first 
paragraph before the period the following subclause: “; and (v) provide grants for mental health 
wellness examination in underserved school districts."